Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.115

Partnership responsibilities—Department's duties—Partnership's duties.

(1) In order to meet its partnership responsibilities, the department shall:

(a) Work collaboratively with the nongovernmental private-public partnership; and

(b) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as grants to the nongovernmental private-public partnership.

(2) In order to meet its partnership responsibilities, the nongovernmental private-public partnership shall:

(a) Work with and complement existing statewide efforts by enhancing parent resources and support, child care, preschool, and other early learning environments;

(b) Accept and expend funds to be used for quality improvement initiatives, including but not limited to parent resources and support, and support the alignment of existing funding streams and coordination of efforts across sectors;

(c) In conjunction with the department, provide leadership to early learning private-public partnerships forming in communities across the state. These local partnerships shall be encouraged to seek local funding and develop strategies to improve coordination and exchange information between the community, early care and education programs, and the K-12 system; and

(d) Assist the statewide movement to high quality early learning and the support of parents as a child's first and best teacher.

[ 2007 c 394 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.215.110.]

NOTES:

Finding—Declaration—Captions not law—2007 c 394: See notes following RCW 43.216.010.